Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.205

Partner's transferable interest in partnership.

The only transferable interest of a partner in the partnership is the partner's share of the profits and losses of the partnership and the partner's right to receive distributions. The interest is personal property.

[ 1998 c 103 s 502.]